Maryland, session 2026, HB1307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
2–902.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “EMPLOYER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN 29 U.S.C.
§ 152.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1307*

HOUSE BILL 1307
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN EMPLOYER SUBJECT TO THE
FEDERAL NATIONAL LABOR RELATIONS ACT AND THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY
THE NATIONAL LABOR RELATIONS BOARD UNDER THE ACT.
(C) (1) ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026, AN EMPLOYER THAT RECEIVES
$250,000 OR MORE IN STATE PUBLIC FUNDS AS PART OF A SINGLE TRANSACTION OR
CONTRACT WITH THE STATE SHALL, AS A CONDITION OF RECEIVING THE FUNDS:
(I) AGREE AND ACKNOWLEDGE THAT THE EMPLOYEES OF THE
EMPLOYER ARE SUBJECT TO THE BENEFITS AND PROTECTIONS OF THE NATIONAL
LABOR RELATIONS ACT;
(II) AGREE NOT TO ENGAGE IN AN UNFAIR LABOR PRACTICE AS
DESCRIBED UNDER 29 U.S.C. § 158; AND
(III) ACKNOWLEDGE THAT VIOLATION OF ITEM (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH MAY RESULT IN THE RECAPTURE OF STATE PUBLIC FUNDS RECEIVED,
UP TO THE FULL AMOUNT.
(2) IF AN EMPLOYER VIOLATES THE AGREEMENTS MADE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OR (II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE STATE MAY RECAPTURE THE
TOTAL AMOUNT OF STATE PUBLIC FUNDS RECEIVED BY THE EMPLOYER FOR UP TO
2 YEARS AFTER FULL DISBURSEMENT OF THE FUNDS.
(D) (1) IF AN EMPLOYEE BELIEVES THAT AN EMPLOYER HAS VIOLATED
SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE EMPLOYEE MAY FILE A COMPLAINT WITH
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(2) AFTER RECEIVING A COMPLAINT FILED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL CONDUCT AN
INVESTIGATION.
(3) AFTER AN INVESTIGATION, IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
DETERMINES THAT THE EMPLOYER HAS VIOLATED SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS
SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION ON BEHALF OF THE
EMPLOYEE.
(4) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL MAY SEEK:
(I) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF;

HOUSE BILL 1307 3
(II) UP TO THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF STATE PUBLIC FUNDS
RECEIVED BY THE EMPLOYER; OR
(III) ANY OTHER RELIEF THAT THE COURT DETERMINES
APPROPRIATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.